District of Columbia statutes.
6-751.11

Smoke detector and fire alarm notice.

(a)

(1)

An owner of an apartment building shall post in conspicuous places in the common areas of the building and provide to each tenant or unit owner, by hand or first-class mail, a written notice that includes:

(A)

Instructions on the operation of the apartment building fire alarm;

(B)

Whether the apartment building fire alarm is separate from or connected to the smoke detectors in the individual dwelling units;

(C)

Whether the apartment building fire alarm is connected to the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department; and

(D)

A warning that in the event of a fire the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department must be contacted immediately by calling 911.

(2)

The notice required by paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be on a form developed by the Mayor and published by the Mayor in English and in the languages required under § 2-1933.

(b)

For the purposes of this section, the term:

(1)

“Apartment building” means a structure containing 4 or more dwelling units, including a condominium or cooperative but excluding a single-family residence.

(2)

“Condominium” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 42-2002(2).

(3)

“Cooperative” shall have the same meaning as provided for the term “cooperative housing association” in § 42-3501.03(7).

June 20, 1978, D.C. Law 2-81, § 9c
as added Mar. 11, 2010, D.C. Law 18-116, § 3, 57 DCR 893

History

For temporary (225 days) addition of section, see § 2 - 3 of the Private Security Camera Incentive Program Temporary Act of 2016 D.C. Law 21-97, April 6, 2016, 63 DCR 2208, 20 DCSTAT 3132).

Temporary Legislation

Abandoned and Junk Vehicle Division, duties, junk vehicles on private property, see § 50-2402.

Cross References

Delegation of Authority under the Fire Alarm Notice and Tenant Fire Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2009, see Mayor’s Order 2009-101, June 12, 2009 ( 56 DCR 6844).

Delegation of Authority